en: Swedish ingredient
sv: Svensk råvare, Svensk ingrediens, Råvaren har svenskt ursprung

en: Made in Swiss, made in Switzerland, swiss made
bg: Произведено в Швейцария
ca: Fet a Suïssa
de: Hergestellt in der Schweiz
es: Hecho en Suiza
fi: Valmistettu Sveitsissä
fr: Fabriqué en Suisse
he: מיוצר בשווייץ, מיוצר בשוויץ
hr: proizvedeno u Švicarskoj
hu: Svájcban készült
it: Prodotto in Svizzera
nl: Geproduceerd in Zwitserland
pl: Wyprodukowano w Szwajcarii
pt: Fabricado na Suíça, feito na Suíça, produzido na Suíça

en: Made in Mexico
bg: Произведено в Мексико
ca: Fet a Mèxic
de: Hergestellt in Mexiko
es: Hecho en México
fi: Valmistettu Meksikossa
he: מיוצר במקסיקו
hu: Mexikóban készült
it: Prodotto in Messico
nl: Geproduceerd in Mexico
pl: Wyprodukowano w Meksyku, Wyprodukowano w Mexyku
pt: Fabricado no México, feito no México, produzido no México

es: Sistema de Etiquetado Frontal de Alimentos y Bebidas, Sistema de Etiquetado Frontal de Alimentos y Bebidas (SEFAB), SEFAB
xx: Sistema de Etiquetado Frontal de Alimentos y Bebidas, Sistema de Etiquetado Frontal de Alimentos y Bebidas (SEFAB), SEFAB

es: Exceso Calorías, Exceso Calorías Secretaría de Salud
xx: Exceso Calorías, Exceso Calorías Secretaría de Salud

es: Exceso Azúcares, Exceso Azúcares Secretaría de Salud
xx: Exceso Azúcares, Exceso Azúcares Secretaría de Salud

es: Exceso Grasas Totales, Exceso Grasas Totales Ministerio de Salud
xx: Exceso Grasas Totales, Exceso Grasas Totales Ministerio de Salud

es: Exceso Grasas Saturadas, Exceso Grasas Saturadas Secretaría de Salud
xx: Exceso Grasas Saturadas, Exceso Grasas Saturadas Secretaría de Salud

es: Exceso Grasas Trans, Exceso Grasas Trans Secretaría de Salud
xx: Exceso Grasas Trans, Exceso Grasas Trans Secretaría de Salud

es: Exceso Sodio, Exceso Sodi Secretaría de Salud
xx: Exceso Sodio, Exceso Sodi Secretaría de Salud

es: contiene cafeína evitar en niños
xx: contiene cafeína evitar en niños

es: contiene edulcorantes no recomendable en niños
xx: contiene edulcorantes no recomendable en niños

es: 1 Sello, 1 Sello Secretaría de Salud
xx: 1 Sello, 1 Sello Secretaría de Salud

es: 2 Sellos, 2 Sellos Secretaría de Salud
xx: 2 Sellos, 2 Sellos Secretaría de Salud

es: 3 Sellos, 3 Sellos Secretaría de Salud
xx: 3 Sellos, 3 Sellos Secretaría de Salud

es: 4 Sellos, 4 Sellos Secretaría de Salud
xx: 4 Sellos, 4 Sellos Secretaría de Salud

es: 5 Sellos, 5 Sellos Secretaría de Salud
xx: 5 Sellos, 5 Sellos Secretaría de Salud

en: Made in the EU, Made in the European Union
bg: Произведено в ЕС, Произведено в Европейския съюз
ca: Fet a la UE, Fet a la Unió Europea
cs: Vyrobeno v EU, Vyrobeno v Evropské unii
de: Hergestellt in der EU, Hergestellt in der Europäischen Union
es: Hecho en la UE, Hecho en la Unión Europea
fi: Valmistettu EU:ssa, Valmistettu Euroopan unionissa
fr: Fabriqué dans l'UE, Fabriqué dans l'Union européenne
he: נעשה באיחוד האירופי, נעשה באיחוד האירופי
hr: Proizvedeno u EU, Proizvedeno u Europskoj uniji
hu: Az EU-ban készült, Az Európai Unióban készült, EU-ban készült, Európai Unióban készült
it: Prodotto nell'UE, Prodotto nell'EU, Prodotto nell'Unione europea
nl: Gemaakt in de EU, Gemaakt in de Europese Unie, Geproduceerd in de EU
pl: Wyprodukowano w UE, Wyprodukowano w Unii Europejskiej
pt: Feito na UE, fabricado na UE, Feito na UE, Feito na União Europeia, produzido na UE, feito na União Europeia, fabricado na União Europeia, produzido na União Europeia, feito na Europa, fabricado na Europa, produzido na Europa

en: Limited edition
ca: Edició limitada
de: Limitierte Sonderedition
es: Edición limitada
fi: rajoitettu erä
fr: Edition limitée
he: מהדורה מוגבלת
hu: Limitált kiadás
it: Edizione limitata
nl: Beperkte oplage
pt: Edição limitada
ru: Лимитированное издание

en: Egg laid in France
ca: Ous posats a França
de: in Frankreich gelegte Eier
fi: munittu Ranskassa
fr: Pondu en France, Pondue en France, Pondues en France, Pondus en France, oeufs pondus en France
it: Uova deposte in Francia
pt: Ovos postos em França